Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Food


Emancipation and Sovereignty Act of 2026”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.6 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:



Req. No. 3499 Page 1


1. “Direct sale” means the sale or exchange of food products


directly from a producer to an end consumer, including through farm


stands, farmers’ markets, delivery arrangements, or community-


supported agriculture or on farm, “farm-to-table” meals;


2. “Local food product” means any meat, grain, dairy, eggs,


nuts, honey, vegetable, fruit, or baked or prepared food product


that is produced, processed, or cooked entirely within the state;


3. “Producer” means an individual or family farm, ranch,


bakery, dairy, or kitchen operating within the state that raises,


grows, harvests, or creates agricultural or food products for direct


sale; and


4. “State jurisdiction” means regulatory or inspection


authority administered by a state agency, county, or municipal


government of this state.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.7 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Food products that are produced, processed, and sold


entirely within the state and do not enter interstate commerce shall


be deemed under exclusive state jurisdiction.


B. The sale or provision of local food products directly from a


producer in this state to a consumer in this state shall be exempt


from federal oversight, licensing, or food inspection including, but


not limited to, regulations administered by the United States Food

Req. No. 3499 Page 2


and Drug Administration or the United States Department of


Agriculture, to the fullest extent permitted by federal law.


C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall promulgate simplified safety and labeling standards applicable


only to intrastate transactions under this section, ensuring:


1. Clarity of origin labeling;


2. Transparency of direct-product ingredients; and


3. Minimum sanitation requirements consistent with food safety


best practices.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.8 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No state or local agency shall penalize or restrict a


producer from selling local food directly to consumers provided the


transaction occurs wholly within state boundaries.


B. No state or local agency shall penalize or restrict the


sales of local producers whether through monetary sales restrictions


or limiting the quantity of products sold.


C. Producers may, but are not required to, register with the


Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry as “Oklahoma


Direct Food Sellers” to qualify for simplified labeling and


cooperative marketing support.





Req. No. 3499 Page 3


D. The allowable state fees or permits for producers shall not


exceed a seventy-five-dollar one-time plan review fee, seventy-five-


dollar credential fee, and seventy-five-dollar annual renewal fee.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3499 YG 1/15/2026 1:13:40 PM





























Req. No. 3499 Page 4